Rhode Island statutes. Title 19 Financial Institutions
Chapter 12 Receivership

19-12-1.
Application for receivership.

The director, or the director’s designee, is empowered immediately to take possession of any financial institution, credit union, or other licensee under this title and its assets if, upon examination, any financial institution or credit union, which has or has not invoked the conservatorship provisions or the voluntary liquidation provisions of this title, appears to be insolvent by reason of:

The financial institution’s, credit union’s, or other licensee’s financial condition is such that the sum of the financial institution’s, credit union’s, or other licensee’s debts are greater than all of the financial institution’s, credit union’s, or other licensee’s property at a fair valuation, exclusive of property transferred, concealed, or removed with intent to hinder, delay, or defraud the financial institution’s, credit union’s, or other licensee’s creditors or because it is generally not paying or is unable to pay its debts as they become due; or

The financial institution’s, credit union’s, or other licensee’s condition is such as to render the continuance of its business hazardous to the public or to those having funds in its custody; or

The financial institution, credit union, or other licensee has failed to maintain adequate deposit insurance as required by this title; or

The financial institution, credit union, or other licensee has failed to remedy unsafe or unsound practices in violation of a cease and desist order.

The director may apply to the superior court for the appointment of the director, or one of the director’s deputies as receiver. In the case when a financial institution’s or credit union’s deposits are insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, the National Credit Union Administration, or any other agency or instrumentality of the United States that insures the deposits of the financial institution or credit union, as a receiver or receivers of the financial institution, credit union, or other licensee, the receiver may request an injunction to restrain the financial institution, credit union, or other licensee under this title, in whole or in part, from further proceeding with its business, and the court shall have jurisdiction in equity of the application.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 50; P.L. 1998, ch. 441, § 13; P.L. 2022, ch. 338, § 2, effective June 29, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 339, § 2, effective June 29, 2022.

19-12-2.
Appointment and powers of receiver.

The court may appoint, without bond, the director, or one of the director’s deputies, or both, as the receiver or receivers to take possession of the property and effects of the financial institution or credit union, subject to any directions prescribed by the court, and this appointment shall vest in the receiver or receivers all the right, title and interest of the financial institution or credit union in and to its property and effects, and shall vacate and dissolve all attachments or liens thereon, created by, or obtained in, or pursuant to, any suit or proceeding at law or in equity against the financial institution or credit union that was begun within four (4) months before the appointment of the receiver or receivers.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 50.

19-12-3.
Clerical assistance — Legal assistance.

The receiver, or receivers, are authorized to employ any clerical assistance as may be necessary, at the expense of the financial institution or credit union under receivership; but the duties of receivership shall be discharged by the receiver, or receivers, as part of their official duties. The receiver may appoint one or more special deputies to act for him or her, and may appoint clerks, assistants, agents, accountants, and legal counsel as he or she deems necessary. The receiver may grant powers of attorney to execute, acknowledge, and deliver all documents that may be necessary for the transfer of assets or assumption of liabilities. The compensation of the persons appointed by the receiver and the expenses of taking possession of the financial institution or credit union and conducting the receivership proceeding, shall be fixed by the receiver, and shall be paid out of the funds or assets of the financial institution or credit union.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 50.

19-12-4.
Schedule of property given to receiver.

When a receiver or receivers are appointed, the president or treasurer of the financial institution or credit union shall make a schedule of its property, and shall make oath that the schedule sets forth all of the property that the financial institution or credit union owns or is entitled to. The treasurer shall deliver the schedule to the receiver or receivers, who may at any time examine, under oath, the treasurer, board of directors, or trustees, or other officers, to determine whether all of the property that the financial institution or credit union owns or is entitled to has come into the hands of the receiver or receivers.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 50.

19-12-5.
Injunction to restrain carrying on of business.

If any financial institution or credit union appears to have exceeded its powers or failed to comply with any provisions of law, the director may apply to the superior court for the county in which that financial institution or credit union is conducting its business for an injunction to restrain the financial institution or credit union, in whole or in part, from further proceeding with its business, and the court shall have jurisdiction in equity of the application.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 50.

19-12-6.
Legislative findings.

It is hereby found as follows:

Certain financial institutions or credit unions, whose deposits were previously insured by the Rhode Island Share and Deposit Indemnity Corporation, are presently unable to obtain adequate deposit insurance as required by §

19-4-10

(formerly §

19-11-9

).

As a result thereof, a proclamation of the governor dated January 1, 1991, declared a banking emergency under chapter 13 (formerly chapter 18) of this title with respect to certain of those financial institutions or credit unions pursuant to which operations of those financial institutions or credit unions have been suspended pending their obtaining adequate deposit insurance, and a number of them have obtained federal deposit insurance and have been permitted to resume operations.

There remain more than twelve (12) financial institutions or credit unions subject to orders suspending their operations, which orders preclude approximately one hundred ninety thousand (190,000) members and/or depositors of these financial institutions or credit unions from having access to approximately three hundred thousand (300,000) separate accounts that in the aggregate total more than one billion dollars ($1,000,000,000).

The inability of depositors in the remaining financial institutions or credit unions to withdraw their deposits has created hardships not only for those depositors and their families, but also for a broad sector of citizens and businesses in the state of Rhode Island that depend on payments from depositors for goods and services supplied to them.

It is hereby determined to be necessary in order to preserve and restore liquidity to the economy of the state, to protect deposits of state funds in these financial institutions or credit unions, and to protect the health, safety and general welfare of the people of the state of Rhode Island, for the general assembly to exercise its constitutional and other powers to enact measures to achieve these essential public purposes by providing for the relief of persons affected by the suspension of withdrawals from the financial institutions or credit unions affected by the banking emergency by expediting access by depositors to funds and assets in these financial institutions or credit unions.

The numbers of people, accounts, and funds adversely affected indicate that, without prompt state legislative action, there will be a serious negative impact on the health, safety, and general welfare of the people and the economy of the state, already weakened by current economic conditions.

This chapter shall, therefore, be deemed to be an exercise of the police powers of this state to achieve the essential public purpose of providing for the protection of the health, safety, and general welfare of the people of the state by amending the general laws of Rhode Island to grant priorities in distributions to depositors upon the liquidation of financial institutions or credit unions and to expedite receivership and other proceedings intended to make available to depositors and other affected parties funds and the value of assets in the affected financial institutions and credit unions.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 50.

19-12-7.
Priority of claims.

When the superior court assumes jurisdiction of a receivership proceeding with respect to a financial institution or credit union subject to the provisions of this title, the expenses and claims against the financial institution or credit union shall have priority in receiving distributions, including (without limitation) any assumption of liabilities out of the assets of the financial institution or credit union in the following order; except to the extent otherwise provided by subsection (b) of this section, pro rata among any class of claimants having priority until the members of the class have been paid or provided for in full before distribution to any junior class of claimants:

Reasonable administrative expenses as allowed by the court in connection with the administration of the receivership estate, including (without limitation) payment of any loans, together with interest thereon, obtained by the receiver with the approval of the court to fund the operations of the receivership estate and the administration of the receivership proceeding, repayable only from the assets in the estate.

Unsecured claims for wages earned by individuals who provided services as employees to the financial institution or credit union as provided in §

28-14-6.1

, in amounts recommended by the receiver subject to the approval of the court.

Subject to subsections (b) and (d) of this section, unsecured claims of depositors in the financial institution or credit union that does not have, or that has failed to obtain, federal deposit insurance; provided, however, that any such claim shall only have priority under this subsection to the extent that, if the financial institution or credit union had maintained insurance with the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation and whether or not the financial institution or credit union would have been eligible to maintain insurance with the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, the deposit with respect to which the claim relates would have been an “insured deposit” as the term is defined in the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation Act (12 U.S.C. § 1813(m)) as in effect as of December 31, 1990, and would have been covered by deposit insurance under the rules and regulations of the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation in effect as of December 31, 1990. For the purpose of applying the preceding sentence, in the case of a credit union, all types of the credit union’s member share accounts, including regular shares, share certificates, and share draft accounts, except to the extent the accounts constitute equity ownership interests in the credit union under the terms of the charter or bylaws of the credit union, shall be deemed an insured deposit.

Subject to subsections (b) and (d), unsecured claims of depositors in the financial institution or credit union that does not have, or that has failed to obtain, federal deposit insurance for its deposits, to the extent their deposit claims exceed amounts recovered under subsection (a)(3).

Unsecured claims of any local, state, or federal taxing agency entitled by law to priority in distributions from any receivership estate, to the extent of that priority, in any amounts as shall be approved by the court.

Unsecured claims of all general creditors and depositors of the financial institution or credit union to the extent not accorded priority pursuant to subsections (a)(1) through (a)(4), in any amounts as shall be approved by the court.

Distributions entitled to priority under subsection (a)(3) and/or (a)(4) shall be reduced or limited to the extent that either of the following paragraphs apply:

Any distribution to a depositor pursuant to subsection (a)(3) and/or (a)(4) shall be subject to any legally available setoff and reduction to the extent of any default on any debt of the depositor to the financial institution or credit union at the time of such distribution.

Any distribution to a depositor entitled to priority pursuant to subsection (a)(3) and/or (a)(4) may be affected, reduced, or extended in time to the extent that the receiver may recommend, and the court may approve, a plan of distribution with respect to depositor claims entitled to priority that pays promptly (i) a subclass of the claims in full up to a stated amount for administrative convenience and (ii) if the receiver so recommends and the court approves, the stated amount to all other depositors entitled to priority under subsection (a)(3) and/or (a)(4) whose claims exceed the stated amount to provide partial and more timely relief for those depositors.

The claim of a creditor that is secured by a mortgage, security interest, or lien on property in which the financial institution or credit union has an interest is a secured claim to the extent of the value of the estate’s interest in the property or to the extent of amounts subject to setoff, as the case may be, and is an unsecured claim to the extent that the value of the creditor’s interest or the amount so subject to setoff is less than the amount of the claim as approved by the court. Only the unsecured portion of the claim of the secured creditor shall participate in a distribution provided for in subsection (a) hereof.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a)(3) and/or (a)(4) or the provisions of §

42-116-7(3)(i)

and/or (3)(ii) or §

42-116-12

, no priority shall be afforded under subsection (a)(3) and/or (a)(4) to the unsecured claims of any officer, director or employee of any financial institution or credit union or of the Rhode Island Share and Deposit Indemnity Corporation or any other person who, with knowledge of the actual or impending insolvency and/or the impending closing of a financial institution or credit union or of the actual or impending insolvency of and/or the actual or impending cessation of business by the Rhode Island Share and Deposit Indemnity Corporation, and for the purpose of avoiding the loss of funds and/or access to funds in any depository account in any insolvent financial institution or credit union, withdrew from any insolvent financial institution or credit union any amount of money within thirty (30) days prior to the closing of that financial institution or credit union by proclamation of the governor dated January 1, 1991.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 50.

19-12-8.
Priority of claims — Federally insured financial institutions or credit unions.

In a receivership, or a conservatorship under chapter 11 of this title, of a financial institution or credit union whose deposits are insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, the National Credit Union Administration or any other agency or instrumentality of the United States, the allowed expenses and claims against the financial institution or credit union shall have priority in receiving distributions out of the assets of the financial institution or credit union in the following order:

The payment of costs and expenses of the administration of the receivership estate.

The payment of claims for “deposits”, as that term is defined in 12 U.S.C. § 1813(l), including, but not limited to, the claims of depositors in a mutual savings bank for return of their deposits.

Unsecured claims of any local, state, or federal taxing authority entitled by law to priority in distribution from the receivership or conservatorship estate, to the extent of such priority.

Claims of salaried employees of the financial institution or credit union for wages or salaries earned but unpaid as of the commencement of the receivership or conservatorship.

Claims for all other general liabilities not specified herein.

Claims otherwise proper that were not filed within the prescribed time.

Claims for obligations expressly subordinated to deposits and general liability claims.

Any funds remaining shall be paid to the stockholders of the financial institution or credit union, or, in the case of a mutual financial institution in which there are no stockholders, to the depositors in proportion to the respective amounts of their stock or deposits.

Interest shall be given the same priority as the claim on which it is based, but no interest shall be paid on any claim until the principal of all claims within the same class has been paid or adequately provided for in full.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 50.

19-12-9.
Payment of certain priority claims.

In receivership proceedings under this chapter, distributions on account of priority claims described in §

19-12-7(a)(1)

, (a)(2), (a)(3) and/or (a)(4) shall be made to the persons or entities entitled to them as soon as sufficient funds are available to the receiver, subject, however, to §

19-12-7(b)

. The holders of claims entitled to priority under §

19-12-7(a)(2)

, (a)(3) and/or (a)(4) are relieved of the necessity of filing claims with the receiver.

On the recommendation of the receiver, the court may approve a sale or other transfer of all or any part of the assets of the financial institution or credit union for consideration sufficient to pay in full or in part the liabilities of the financial institution or credit union that are entitled to priority in distribution pursuant to §

19-12-7(a)

. The consideration for the transfer, whether in the form of immediate funds or the issuance of deferred obligations, as shall be distributed in accordance with §

19-12-7

in any manner and at any time or times as shall be recommended by the receiver, in a distribution plan as provided in the order of the court approving the transfer.

If the transferee that assumes deposit liabilities of a financial institution or credit union entitled to priority under §

19-12-7(a)(3)

and/or (a)(4) in a transfer so approved is a financial institution or credit union authorized by law to receive deposits, and its deposits, including the assumed deposits of the financial institution or credit union, are protected by federal deposit insurance, the court, on the recommendation of the receiver, may approve the transfer of assets and assumption of liabilities, in which case the priority claims of depositors whose claims were so assumed will be deemed to have been adequately provided for and the priority granted the claims satisfied. If the transferee is an entity, including any corporate entity specially chartered by the Rhode Island general assembly to acquire assets or assume any deposit liabilities of the financial institution or credit union in receivership under this chapter, that assumes all or part of the deposit liabilities of a financial institution or credit union not as deposits in an operating depository institution, but as liabilities to be paid out of the assets acquired, the court, based on the recommendation of the receiver and the best interests of the depositors whose priority claims are to be paid or assumed by the transferee, may approve the transfer and the transferee’s plan of distribution, including provisions therein that would be authorized under §

19-12-7(b)

, in which case the claims entitled to priority pursuant to §

19-12-7(a)(3)

and/or (a)(4) shall be deemed to have been provided for and satisfied to the extent they have been assumed by the transferee.

A transferee that assumes or pays any claim entitled to priority pursuant to §

19-12-7(a)(2)

, (a)(3) and/or (a)(4) pursuant to an order entered by the court under subsection (b) shall be subrogated to the claim and priority position of the employees and depositors whose claims have been so assumed or paid.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 50.

19-12-10.
Automatic stay.

The appointment of a temporary or permanent receiver pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, or the taking of possession of the financial institution or credit union and its assets by the director, or the director’s designee, whichever shall first occur, shall operate as a stay until further order of the court, applicable to all persons and entities, of:

The commencement or continuation, including the issuance or employment of process, of a judicial, administrative, or other action or proceeding against the financial institution or credit union that was, or could have been, commenced before the commencement of the receivership under this chapter, or to recover a claim against the financial institution or credit union that arose before the commencement of the receivership pursuant to this chapter;

The enforcement, against the financial institution or credit union or against property of the receivership estate, or a judgment obtained before the commencement of the receivership under this chapter;

Any act to obtain possession of property of, or from, the receivership estate or to exercise control over property of the estate;

Any act to create, perfect, or enforce any lien against property of the receivership estate;

Any act to create, perfect, or enforce against property of the financial institution or credit union any lien to the extent that the lien secures a claim that arose before the commencement of the receivership under this title;

Any act to collect, assess, or recover a claim against the financial institution or credit union that arose before the commencement of the receivership under this chapter; and

The setoff of any debt owing to the financial institution or credit union that arose before the commencement of the receivership under this chapter against any claim against the financial institution or credit union.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent the issuance, employment, or enforcement of process in conjunction with any investigation by state or federal authorities.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 50.

19-12-11.
Additional powers of receiver.

In addition to powers granted to the receiver pursuant to this chapter or any other law, a receiver appointed under this chapter shall have the power to reject any executory contract or unexpired lease of the financial institution or credit union.

After notice and hearing, the receiver may abandon any property of the receivership estate that is burdensome to the estate or that is of inconsequential value and benefit to the estate.

On request of a party in interest, and after notice and a hearing, the court may order the receiver to abandon any property of the receivership estate that is burdensome to the estate or that is of inconsequential value and benefit to the estate.

Unless the court orders otherwise, any property scheduled pursuant to §

19-12-4

not otherwise administered at the time of the closing of the receivership proceeding is abandoned to the financial institution or credit union, subject to the receivership proceeding being reopened by the court to administer assets, to accord relief to the financial institution or credit union or for other cause.

Unless the court orders otherwise, property of the receivership estate that is not abandoned under this section and that is not administered in the receivership proceeding remains property of the receivership estate.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 50.

19-12-12.
Receiver as a lien creditor and as successor to certain creditors and purchasers.

A receiver appointed pursuant to this chapter shall have, as of the commencement of the receivership proceeding, and without regard to any knowledge of the receiver or of any creditor, the rights and powers of, or may avoid any transfer of property of the financial institution or credit union or any obligation incurred by the financial institution or credit union that is voidable by:

A creditor who extends credit to the financial institution or credit union at the time of the commencement of the receivership proceeding, and who obtains, at that time and with respect to that credit, a judicial lien on all property on which a creditor on a simple contract could have obtained a judicial lien, whether or not a creditor exists;

A creditor who extends credit to the financial institution or credit union at the time of the commencement of the receivership proceeding, and obtains, at that time and with respect to that credit, an execution against the financial institution or credit union that is returned unsatisfied at that time, whether or not a creditor exists; or

A bona fide purchaser of real property, other than fixtures, from the financial institution or credit union, against whom applicable law permits the transfer to be perfected, and obtains the status of a bona fide purchaser and has perfected the transfer at the time of the commencement of the receivership proceeding, whether or not a purchaser exists.

The receiver may avoid any transfer of an interest of the financial institution or credit union in property or any obligation incurred by the financial institution or credit union that is voidable under any applicable law by a creditor holding an unsecured claim against the financial institution or credit union.

Without limiting the provisions of subsection (a), the receiver shall be deemed a lien creditor as that term is defined in §

6A-9-301

-(3) and a creditor as that term is defined in §

6-16-1

and shall have all the rights and powers accorded to the lien creditor or creditor by any provisions of applicable law.

In the event that the receiver shall make any sale or other transfer of all or any part of the assets of the financial institution or credit union to any transferee, the status and the rights and powers accorded the receiver by virtue of the provisions of subsections (a) through (c) of this section shall automatically vest in the transferee with respect to the assets.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 50.

19-12-13.
Agreements against interest of the financial institution or credit union.

No agreement that tends to diminish or defeat the interest of the financial institution or credit union and any asset acquired by the receiver acting in a proceeding under this chapter or by any person or entity acquiring all or any of the interests or assets by a sale or other transfer approved by any order of the court entered in a receivership proceeding under this chapter, including (without limitation) loans made by the financial institution or credit union or any security therefor, shall be valid against the receiver or transferee unless the agreement (1) is in writing; (2) was executed by the financial institution or credit union and any person claiming an adverse interest thereunder, including the obligor, contemporaneously with the acquisition of the assets by the financial institution or credit union; (3) was approved by the governing body of the financial institution or credit union or its loan or other authorizing committee, which approval shall be reflected in the minutes of the board or committee; and (4) has been, continuously, from the time of its execution, an official record of the financial institution or credit union.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 50.

19-12-14.
Presumptions.

With respect to any financial institution or credit union to which a receivership proceeding is commenced pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, any member of its governing body or officer who votes or takes any action solely to approve or authorize the commencement of the proceeding or to accept service of citation or other process; to admit or cause to be admitted the allegations of any complaint or petition commencing the proceeding; or to consent to or join in the request for relief contained therein, shall be conclusively presumed to have taken the action in good faith, in the exercise of a reasonable business judgment, and in the best interests of the financial institution or credit union, its depositors, or other creditors.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 50.

19-12-15.
Notice to parties.

The court having jurisdiction over any proceedings under this chapter shall have full power to shorten the time for scheduling hearings and giving notice thereof and to limit notice of creditors, depositors, and other parties in interest to newspaper publication or other means as it shall deem appropriate, given the exigencies of the proceeding, the number of parties to be given notice, and the expenses of providing that form of notice.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 50.

19-12-16.
Appeals.

Any order or judgment of the court having jurisdiction of any receivership proceeding under this chapter that provides for a payment to employees and depositors that have priority under §

19-12-7(a)(2)

, (a)(3) and/or (a)(4) or a transfer of assets of the financial institution or credit union for a consideration that includes the payment or assumption of some or all of the liabilities of the financial institution or credit union to the employees or depositors shall be final and binding and not subject to reversal on appeal unless, prior to the consummation of the transfer, the court that entered the judgment shall, on motion of an aggrieved party in interest, grant a stay pending appeal conditioned upon the appellant filing a supersedeas bond in the full amount of the loss the employees and depositors may sustain in the event the order or judgment is upheld on appeal or the supreme court shall, after the motion has been denied by the superior court and prior to the consummation of the payment or transfer, grant a stay pending appeal conditioned upon the appellant filing a similarly conditioned supersedeas bond.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 50.

19-12-17.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or the application of this chapter to any person or circumstances is held invalid or unconstitutional, the invalidity or unconstitutionality shall not affect other provisions or applications of this chapter that can be given effect without the invalid or unconstitutional provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are declared to be severable. This chapter shall be construed liberally in aid of its purpose and legislative findings.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 50.